Delaware, session 153, SB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 131(a)(2), Title 23 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: (2) The charges per unit shall be are as follows: Effective January 1, 2022 $14.91 2025, $17.26 per unit . Effective January 1, 2023 $15.66 2026, $17.78 per unit . Effective January 1, 2024 $16.44 2027, $18.31 per unit . E ffective January 1, 2025 $17.26 2028, $18.86 per unit . Section 2. Amend Â§ 131(a)(3), Title 23 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: (3) There shall be is a minimum charge of 200 units and a maximum unit charge as follows: Effective January 1, 2022 2025, 1,550 units . Effective January 1, 2023 1,550 2026, 1,600 units Effective January 1, 2024 1,550 2027, 1,600 units. Effective January 1, 2025 1,550 2028, 1,600 units. Section 3. Amend Â§ 131(b)(2), Title 23 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: (2) The charges per unit shall be are as follows: Â Effective January 1, 2022 $14.91 2025, $17.26 per unit. Â Effective January 1, 2023 $15.66 2026, $17.78 per unit. Â Effective January 1, 2024 $16.44 2027, $18.31 per unit. Effective January 1, 2025 $17.26 2028, $18.86 per unit. Â Section 4. Amend Â§ 131(b)(3), Title 23 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: (3) There shall be is a minimum charge of 200 units and a maximum unit charge as follows: Â Effective January 1, 2022 2025, 1,550 units. Â Effective January 1, 2023 1,550 2026, 1,600 units. Â Effective January 1, 2024 1,550 2027, 1,600 units. Â Effective January 1, 2025 1,550 2028, 1,600 units.